Hawaii, session 2026, HB2556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Emergency preparedness; safety and security.  (a) To ensure the safety of students, teachers, and school staff: (1)  All classroom doors shall be retrofitted with an interior lock by January 1, 2027; (2)  All classrooms and outside gathering spaces shall be connected to a public address system that is independent of the school's phone system by January 1, 2027; (3)  All schools shall be equipped with an emergency access route which features more than one entrance and exit by January 1, 2027; and (4)  All classrooms and outside gathering spaces shall feature functioning fire alarms with both an auditory and visual component. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Emergency management plan; emergency preparedness.  (a) The department shall establish an emergency management plan for all schools to prepare for and respond to an emergency or disaster, as defined in section 127A-2.  Emergency management plans shall be updated on a yearly basis and shall include: (1)  Mandatory emergency preparedness training for all teachers, students, and school staff that includes: (A)  Annual training for all teachers and staff on violence prevention, awareness, reporting, and emergency response conducted in conjunction with law enforcement and aligned with best practices; (B)  Annual, age-appropriate training for all students on violence prevention, awareness, reporting, and emergency response that is aligned with established best practices; (C)  Teacher, staff, and student training on the protocol for initiating an emergency response; (D)  Teacher, staff, and student training on a standardized emergency response protocol; (E)  Basic safety training such as first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation for all teachers and security personnel; and (F)  Parent and guardian access to relevant information regarding emergency response plans; and (2)  At least four emergency practice drills per year at each school, some of which shall occur during inopportune times of the school day such as recess or during a school assembly, to address the following emergency situations: (A)  Lock down; (B)  Fire; (C)  Severe weather; and (D)  Active shooter. (b)  Each school shall regularly test their public address system and fire alarms, no less than once every three months." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $        or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of the emergency preparedness procedures and equipment outlined above. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________